Florida, session 2026, HB375.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of section
395.0191, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
395.0191 Staff membership and clinical privileges.—
(2)
(b) An advanced practice registered nurse who is certified
as a registered nurse anesthetist licensed under part I of
chapter 464 shall administer anesthesia under the onsite medical
direction of a professional licensed under chapter 458, chapter
459, or chapter 466, and in accordance with an established
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb375-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 375 2026
protocol approved by the medical staff. The medical direction
shall specifically address the needs of the individual patient.
This paragraph does not apply to an autonomous advanced practice
registered nurse registered under s. 464.0123 who is certified
as a registered nurse anesthetist licensed under part I of
chapter 464; however, a facility may require a certified
registered nurse anesthetist who is registered and practicing
under s. 464.0123 to perform acts under an established protocol
approved by the medical staff or the governing board of the
facility.
Section 2. Paragraph (b) of subsection (4) of section
464.012, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
464.012 Licensure of advanced practice registered nurses;
fees; controlled substance prescribing.—
(4) In addition to the general functions specified in
subsection (3), an advanced practice registered nurse may
perform the following acts within his or her specialty:
(b) A The certified registered nurse anesthetist may, to
the extent authorized by an established protocol approved by the
medical staff of the facility in which the anesthetic service is
performed, or a certified registered nurse anesthetist that is
registered and practicing under s. 464.0123 without an
established protocol, may perform any or all of the following:
1. Determine the health status of the patient as it
relates to the risk factors and to the anesthetic management of
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb375-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 375 2026
the patient through the performance of the general functions.
2. Based on history, physical assessment, and supplemental
laboratory results, determine, with the consent of the
responsible physician, the appropriate type of anesthesia under
within the framework of the protocol unless the certified
registered nurse anesthetist is registered and practicing under
s. 464.0123 without an established protocol.
3. Order under the protocol preanesthetic medication under
the protocol unless the certified registered nurse anesthetist
is registered and practicing under s. 464.0123 without an
established protocol.
4. Perform under the protocol procedures commonly used to
render the patient insensible to pain during the performance of
surgical, obstetrical, therapeutic, or diagnostic clinical
procedures under the protocol unless the certified registered
nurse anesthetist is registered and practicing under s. 464.0123
without an established protocol. These procedures include
ordering and administering regional, spinal, and general
anesthesia; inhalation agents and techniques; intravenous agents
and techniques; and techniques of hypnosis.
5. Order or perform monitoring procedures indicated as
pertinent to the anesthetic health care management of the
patient.
6. Support life functions during anesthesia health care,
including induction and intubation procedures, the use of
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb375-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 375 2026
appropriate mechanical supportive devices, and the management of
fluid, electrolyte, and blood component balances.
7. Recognize and take appropriate corrective action for
abnormal patient responses to anesthesia, adjunctive medication,
or other forms of therapy.
8. Recognize and treat a cardiac arrhythmia while the
patient is under anesthetic care.
9. Participate in management of the patient while in the
postanesthesia recovery area, including ordering the
administration of fluids and drugs.
10. Place special peripheral and central venous and
arterial lines for blood sampling and monitoring as appropriate.

A certified registered nurse anesthetist registered and
practicing under s. 464.0123 without an established protocol may
only perform acts authorized under part I of this chapter.
Section 3. Paragraph (a) of subsection (3) of section
464.0123, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
464.0123 Autonomous practice by an advanced practice
registered nurse.—
(3) PRACTICE REQUIREMENTS.—
(a) An advanced practice registered nurse who is
registered under this section may:
1. Engage in autonomous practice only in primary care
100 practice, including family medicine, general pediatrics, and
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb375-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 375 2026
101 general internal medicine, as defined by board rule.
102 2. For certified nurse midwives, engage in autonomous
103 practice in the performance of the acts listed in s.
104 464.012(4)(c).
105 3. Perform the general functions of an advanced practice
106 registered nurse under s. 464.012(3) related to primary care.
107 4. For certified registered nurse anesthetists registered
108 and practicing under this section, perform the acts listed in s.
109 464.012(4)(b).
110 5.4. For a patient who requires the services of a health
111 care facility, as defined in s. 408.032(8):
112 a. Admit the patient to the facility.
113 b. Manage the care received by the patient in the
114 facility.
115 c. Discharge the patient from the facility, unless
116 prohibited by federal law or rule.
117 6.5. Provide a signature, certification, stamp,
118 verification, affidavit, or endorsement that is otherwise
119 required by law to be provided by a physician, except an
120 advanced practice registered nurse registered under this section
121 may not issue a physician certification under s. 381.986.
122 Section 4. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb375-00